Utah statutes.
59-1-203.   Conflicts of interest -- Salaries -- Ethics.
(1)  No person appointed as a member of the commission may hold any other
office under the laws of this state, the government of the United States, or
any other state.  Each member shall devote full time to the duties of the
office and may not hold any other position of trust or profit under the
Constitution nor engage in any other occupation that would create a direct
conflict with the duties of a commissioner.
(2)  The salaries of the commissioners shall be established by the governor
within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22,
State Officer Compensation. Commissioners shall also be allowed expenses as
provided by law.
(3)  No commissioner, executive director, or consultant shall engage in
political or charitable fund raising activities.  Commissioners and commission
employees are governed by Title 67, Chapter 16, Utah Public Officers' and
Employees' Ethics Act.
